Utah statutes.
20A-5-701.   Willful neglect of duty or corrupt conduct -- Penalty.

(1)  It is unlawful for any poll worker to willfully neglect the poll worker's duty or to willfully act corruptly in discharging the poll worker's duty.

(2)  Any poll worker who violates this section is guilty of a third degree felony.



Amended by Chapter 253, 2013 General Session

